North Dakota, session 69, SB2112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-00.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-00.1. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter:
1. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
2. "Eligible" means an individual has been deemed eligible by the department for developmental
disability services.
3. "Individual served" is an eligible individual who is a legal resident of the state of North Dakota
and is receiving services from the life skills and transition center.
4. "Noneligible" means a minor who is a legal resident of the state and has not been deemed
eligible by the department for developmental disability services.
5. "Nonresident individual served" includes:
a. Any individual served by the life skills and transition center who is under eighteen years
old and whose responsible relative is not a bona fide resident of this state.
b. Any enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe for whom the United States
government has, through its statutes and regulations, a responsibility for their care.
5.6. "Nonresident responsible relative" includes the nonresident spouse, father, or mother of the
individual served. It includes the bureau of Indian affairs in those cases involving an enrolled
member of a federally recognized Indian tribe for whom the United States government has,
through its statutes and regulations, a responsibility for their care.
6.7. "Nonresidential services" means rehabilitative services and supports that are provided in a
family home or community setting.
7.8. "Residential services" are specialized services and supports provided at the life skills and
transition center facility which include both room and board and rehabilitative services in
accordance with an individual's care and support plan. Residential services provided at the life
skills and transition center are available to address an individual's needs for stabilization.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 2
25-04-02. Purpose of life skills and transition center.
1. The purpose of the life skills and transition center is to serve as a specialty care and support
resource for eligible individuals with developmental disabilities who are experiencing crisis or
who would benefit from stabilization, and to work together with parent, guardian, or legal
custodian and care teams to identify opportunities for each individual served to live in a family
home or community setting of their choice when possible.
2. The life skills and transition center must be maintained to provide care, treatment, training,
rehabilitation, and supervision for eligible individuals. For this purpose the department may
introduce and establish such rehabilitative and support services as, in its judgment, will best
prepare the individuals served to live in the most integrated, independent setting possible.
3. The life skills and transition center may provide both residential services and nonresidential
services and effectuate its powers and duties to best serve eligible individuals who may
benefit from those activities.
4. Upon approval of the commissioner of the department or designee and in the opinion of the
superintendent of the life skills and transition center, the life skills and transition center may
provide:
a. Residential services or nonresidential services and effectuate its powers and duties to
best serve noneligible individuals who are experiencing crisis or who would benefit from
stabilization and may benefit from those activities; or
b. Consultation services to public and private providers serving noneligible individuals.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-04. Who may receive benefits of life skills and transition center.
1. Subject to this chapter and to any rules adopted by the department, the benefits of the life
skills and transition center may be received only by:
a. Eligible individuals who may benefit from services provided by the life skills and transition
center who, in the opinion of the superintendent of the life skills and transition center are
of suitable age and capacity to receive care, treatment, training, rehabilitation, or
supervision by the life skills and transition center or whose disabilities prevent them from
receiving training and instruction in the public schools;
b. Eligible individuals who, in the opinion of the superintendent of the life skills and
transition center, may benefit from services provided by the life skills and transition center
and who are in need of stabilization supports and cannot be properly cared for in their
family home or other available community settings; or
c. Eligible individuals who, in the opinion of the superintendent of the life skills and
transition center, may benefit from either residential services or nonresidential services
provided by the life skills and transition center; or
d. Noneligible individuals who, upon approval of the commissioner of the department or
designee and in the opinion of the superintendent of the life skills and transition center,
may benefit from:
(1) Residential services for up to ninety days, unless an extension is granted for an
additional ninety days by the superintendent of the life skills and transition center to
facilitate effective transition;
(2) Nonresidential services provided by the life skills and transition center; or

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 3
(3) Consultation services to public and private providers serving noneligible individuals.
2. Residents and nonresidents of this state may receive services from the life skills and transition
center. Priority, however, must be given to residentsResidents of this state and minors with
developmental disabilities must be given priority in receiving services from the life skills and
transition center.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-04.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-04.1. Program management for an individual served.
The department shall ensure active program management is maintained for eligible individuals
served and noneligible individuals receiving residential services at the life skills and transition center.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-05. Qualifications for accessing services provided by life skills and transition center -
Educational or related services without charge for individuals twenty-one years of age and
under.
1. The superintendent of the life skills and transition center may admit an eligible or noneligible
individual to the life skills and transition center for residential services based on consideration
of the following factors:
a. Ability of the life skills and transition center to provide the appropriate level of care based
on the individual's need.
b. Health and safety considerations for both the individual served and other individuals
currently being served by the life skills and transition center.
c. The individual may be admitted without exceeding the resident capacity of the facility as
specified in the professional standards of the department.
d. A noneligible individual may not receive residential services to the exclusion of an eligible
individual, unless the noneligible individual is receiving residential services before the life
skills and transition center receives an application to admit an eligible individual for
residential services.
2. The superintendent of the life skills and transition center may approve an eligible or
noneligible individual for nonresidential services provided by the life skills and transition center
if all of the following conditions have been met:
a. Application has been made on behalf of the individual by a department developmental
disabilities program manager, a parent, guardian, or legal custodian, in accordance with
procedures established by the department.
b. Information has been submitted to the life skills and transition center which allows the
superintendent to determine that the individual servedeligible or noneligible individual
would benefit from nonresidential:
(1) Nonresidential stabilization services offered by the life skills and transition center for
the purpose of avoiding institutionalization or further destabilization of the
individual's living situation; or
(2) Consultation services to public and private providers serving noneligible individuals.

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 4
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no eligible individual served, twenty-one
years of age or under, no noneligible individual, eighteen years of age or under, or the estate
or the parent of such individual, may be charged for educational or related services provided
at the life skills and transition center. Except as provided in subsection 4, the department has
prior claim on all benefits accruing to such individuals served or noneligible individuals for
medical and medically related services under entitlement from the federal government,
medical or hospital insurance contracts, workforce safety and insurance, or medical care and
disability programs. For purposes of this subsection, "related services" means transportation
and such developmental, corrective, and other supportive services, as determined by the
department of public instruction, as are required to assist an individual with a developmental
disability to benefit from special education. The cost of related services other than medical and
medically related services must be paid by the life skills and transition center, the school
district of residence of the child with a developmental disability, and other appropriate state
agencies and political subdivisions of this state. The department of public instruction, the
department, the school district of residence, and other appropriate state agencies and political
subdivisions, as determined by the department of public instruction, shall determine and agree
to that portion of related services, other than medical and medically related services, for which
each agency and political subdivision is liable. The department of public instruction may adopt
rules necessary to implement this section.
4. Parents of an eligible individual, who is twenty-one years of age or under, are not required to
file, assist in filing, agree to filing, or assign an insurance claim when filing the claim would
pose a realistic threat that the parents would suffer a financial loss not incurred by similarly
situated parents of children with disabilities. Financial losses do not include incidental costs
such as the time needed to file or assist in filing an insurance claim or the postage needed to
mail the claim. Financial losses include:
a. A decrease in available lifetime coverage or any other benefit under an insurance policy.
b. An increase in premiums or the discontinuation of a policy.
c. An out-of-pocket expense such as the payment of a deductible amount incurred in filing a
claim unless the life skills and transition center pays or waives the out-of-pocket
expense.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-05.1. Transfer of individuals - Visiting privileges - Release and placement of
individuals served.
1. The superintendent of the life skills and transition center shall have the right of temporary
transfer of any individual served or noneligible individual, at the life skills and transition center,
to an appropriate hospital or other specialized facility when in the superintendent's opinion the
immediate health and safety of the individual or the immediate health and safety of others
requires the transfer.
2. Subject to reasonable rules for the orderly operation of the life skills and transition center, any
parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the individual served or noneligible individual shall have
the right of visiting and communicating with the individual served or noneligible individual and
authorizing visits and communications with others.
3. The superintendent may authorize the temporary discharge of any individual served or
noneligible individual to the custody of the individual served's or noneligible individual's parent,
guardian, or legal custodian of the individual, or to another person designated by the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian. In the absence of such authorization, any parent, guardian, or
legal custodian of the individual served may formally request, in writing, the individual served's
temporary discharge. The discharge must be granted at the earliest reasonable opportunity,

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 5
but not more than thirty days after receipt of a written application. If a discharge is, or would
be, effected contrary to the advice of the superintendent based on a recent comprehensive
evaluation of the individual, the superintendent shall so advise the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian in writing.
4. The superintendent may arrange for the suitable placement of an:
a. An individual served outside the life skills and transition center and to discharge the
individual served, provided placement has been preceded by a comprehensive
evaluation. No such placement of an individual served may be effected until all
reasonable efforts have been made to consult with the individual served's care team and
parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the individual served; and
b. A noneligible individual outside the life skills and transition center or to discharge the
noneligible individual.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-08. Discharge of an individual served from life skills and transition center.
An individual who receives residential services at the life skills and transition center must be
discharged if any one of the following conditions are present:
1. The superintendent of the life skills and transition center, on the basis of a comprehensive
evaluation and in consultation with the individual'sindividual served's parent, guardian, legal
custodian, or care team, finds that the care, treatment, training, rehabilitation, and supervision
offered by the life skills and transition center are no longer needed.
2. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian who voluntarily admitted the individual served to
residential services at the life skills and transition center and who retains legal custody makes
a written request for discharge.
3. The individual served is admitted on indefinite transfer to a hospital, school, or other facility, or
a protective service under the jurisdiction of another state, or another agency or department of
this state.
4. A court of competent jurisdiction orders the discharge of the individual served.
5. The superintendent makes a determination that the noneligible individual no longer qualifies
for accessing services provided by the life skills and transition center.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-08.1. Notification before discharge.
Before discharge the superintendent of the life skills and transition center shall meet with the
parent, guardian, legal custodian, or care team of the individual:
1. Individual served to be discharged, or with the court that ordered the individual served to
receive services at the life skills and transition center pursuant to section 25-04-06.
2. Noneligible individual to be discharged.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 6
25-04-14. Expenses chargeable against individual or individual's estate - Filing claims.
Expenses for care and treatment of each individual served or noneligible individual by the life skills
and transition center must, if practicable, be in accordance with the cost of providing care and treatment
for the different degrees or conditions of mental and physical health and charges may be adjusted in
accordance with the individual served's or noneligible individual's ability to pay which must include an
estimate of potential future receipts, including amounts from estates. The department shall recover from
the individual served or noneligible individual or from a discharged individual expenses chargeable for
care and treatment. If any individual served or noneligible individual is receiving social security benefits
or is a veteran or a dependent of a veteran who has received, is receiving, or is entitled to receive
compensation or pension from the veterans' administration, the expenses are a current claim against
the individual served or noneligible individual and may be recovered monthly by the department except
that any amount required by the payer of the benefits to be paid directly to the individual served or
noneligible individual must, upon approval of the department, be credited to the individual served's or
noneligible individual's personal account from any money thus received.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 25-04-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-04-17. Reduction or writeoff of accounts - Report to legislative audit and fiscal review
committee.
The department may authorize the reduction or writeoff of an individual served's or noneligible
individual's past-due account from the life skills and transition center's financial records upon
determining that the account is not collectible. The department, by September first after the close of
each fiscal year, shall present a detailed report to the legislative audit and fiscal review committee on
the status of accounts receivable for that fiscal year. The report must include:
1. An aging by individual classification of accounts remaining unpaid.
2. The amounts by individual classification by which accounts were reduced or written off for
reasons other than payment during that fiscal year.
SECTION 11. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT - LIFE SKILLS AND TRANSITION
CENTER. The department of health and human services shall submit a report every six months during
the 2025-27 biennium to legislative management regarding:
1. The number of ineligible children served under this Act by the life skills and transition center,
including consultation services to public and private providers.
2. De-identified information and reasons describing barriers to utilization of community-based
services for ineligible children served under this Act by the life skills and transition center,
including efforts made by the life skills and transition center.
3. The activities and strategies of the department, and any statutory recommendations to
improve the state's community-based services and alternative community crisis and
stabilization services to ineligible children served under this Act.
SECTION 12. STUDY OF LIFE SKILLS AND TRANSITION CENTER ALTERNATIVES -
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT.
During the 2025-26 interim, the department of health and human services shall study alternatives to
placement at the life skills transition center. The study must include development of a continuum of care
to meet the mental health needs of youth in their community and, if needed, in an appropriate
psychiatric residential facility. By March 1, 2026, the department of health and human services shall
report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the
recommendations, to the legislative management.

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 7
SECTION 13. EXPIRATION DATE. Section 2 of this Act is effective through June 30, 2027, and
after that date is ineffective.

S. B. NO. 2112 - PAGE 8
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2112.
Senate Vote: Yeas 36 Nays 11 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 65 Nays 25 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State